Utah statutes.
9-8-401.   Purpose.
The Legislature determines and declares that the public has a vital interest
in all antiquities, historic and prehistoric ruins, and historic sites,
buildings, and objects which, when neglected, desecrated, destroyed or
diminished in aesthetic value, result in an irreplaceable loss to the people
of this state.
